Washington statutes.
RCW 10.46.070

Conduct of trial—Generally.

The court shall decide all questions of law which shall arise in the course of the trial, and the trial shall be conducted in the same manner as in civil actions.

[ 1891 c 28 s 70; Code 1881 s 1088; 1873 p 237 s 249; 1854 p 119 s 111; RRS s 2158. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1891 c 28 s 66, part; Code 1881 s 1078; 1873 p 236 s 239; 1854 p 118 s 101; RRS s 2137, part, now codified as RCW 10.49.020.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: This section superseded, in part, by CrR 6. See comment preceding CrR 6.1.